Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Administrative action. new text begin (a) new text end "Administrative action" means an action by any official, board, commission or agency of the executive branch to adopt, amend, or repeal a rule under chapter 14. deleted text begin "deleted text end Administrative actiondeleted text begin "deleted text end does not include the application or administration of an adopted ruledeleted text begin , except in cases of rate setting, power plant and powerline siting, and granting of certificates of need under section 216B.243deleted text end . new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), administrative action includes the exercise of any power or duty given to the Public Utilities Commission under statute or adopted rule. new text end